Maryland, session 2026, HB0065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
15–117.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIDUCIARY” INCLUDES AN AGENT, AS DEFINED IN §
17–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) UNLESS WAIVED BY THE CLIENT, A COMMUNICATION BETWEEN
AN ATTORNEY AND A CLIENT THAT ACTS AS A FIDUCIARY IS SUBJECT TO THE
ATTORNEY–CLIENT PRIVILEGE EVEN IF FIDUCIARY FUNDS ARE USED TO
COMPENSATE THE ATTORNEY FOR LEGAL SERVICES RENDERED TO THE CLIENT.
(2) THE EXISTENCE OF A FIDUCIARY RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN A
FIDUCIARY AND A BENEFICIARY DOES NOT CONSTITUTE OR GIVE RISE TO A WAIVER
OF THE ATTORNEY–CLIENT PRIVILEGE FOR COMMUNICATIONS BETWEEN THE
ATTORNEY AND THE FIDUCIARY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 1 –